Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 28 Real Estate Brokers and Salespersons

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to property, conveyances and security transactions, see title 34.

Editor's notes. —

The annotations to sections of this chapter cite some cases that were decided under former similar statutes relating to real estate brokers and salesmen. They have been retained where it was felt they will be helpful.

Purpose of chapter. —

The purpose for which this chapter was enacted was to protect the public from evils which can arise from sales of real estate by unlicensed and unregulated persons. Doran v. Imeson Aviation, Inc., 419 F. Supp. 586, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13489 (D. Wyo. 1976).

This chapter must be construed in light of an obvious purpose of protecting the public in the handling of important and valuable transactions relating to real property. Battlefield, Inc. v. Neely, 656 P.2d 1154,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1983).

Claims against realtors. —

A claim against a realtor is a claim for professional negligence, and realtors are licensed professionals who fall within the scope of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-3-107(a); accordingly, the two-year limitations period of that section applies to all claims against realtors, even those that arose prior to July 1, 2000. Rawlinson v. Greer, 2003 WY 28, 64 P.3d 120,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Application of the Wyoming Real Estate Laws to an Auctioneer,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 195.

For case note, “Real Estate Brokers and Salespersons — When is a Broker Not a Broker? Walter v. Moore, 700 P.2d 1219,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 241 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

12 Am. Jur. 2d Brokers § 1 et seq.

Relative rights and liabilities of vendor and his broker to down payment or earnest money forfeited by vendee for default under real estate contract, 9 ALR2d 495.

Broker's right to commission where customer repudiates or fails to complete contract or promise which is oral or not specifically enforceable, 12 ALR2d 1410.

Effect of statement of real estate broker to prospective purchaser that property may be bought for less than list price as breach of duty to vendor, 17 ALR2d 904.

Character and extent of liability on real estate broker's statutory bond, 17 ALR2d 1012.

What deviation in prospective vendee's proposal from vendor's terms precludes broker from recovering commission for producing a ready, willing, and able vendee, 18 ALR2d 376.

Duty of real estate broker to disclose that prospective purchaser is a relative, 26 ALR2d 1307.

Broker's right to commission on sales consummated after termination of employment, 27 ALR2d 1348.

Agency to sell realty as one coupled with interest, 28 ALR2d 1243.

Broker's right to commission on sales consummated after revocation of authority by principal, 27 ALR2d 1348.

Payment to broker authorized to sell real property as payment to principal, 30 ALR2d 805.

Broker's nondisclosure or misrepresentation of sale price of other property as affecting his rights as against principal, 32 ALR2d 728.

Licensing of real estate broker, 39 ALR2d 606.

Statutory validity of ordinance requiring real estate broker to procure license, 39 ALR2d 606.

Power of real estate broker to execute contract of sale in behalf of principal, 43 ALR2d 1014.

Broker's right to commission where owner sells property to customer of broker at less than price stipulated, 46 ALR2d 848.

Amount of commission recoverable by broker where owner sells property to broker's customer at less than stipulated price, 46 ALR2d 848.

Broker's right to commission for selling part of property, 47 ALR2d 680.

Excessiveness or inadequacy of damages for personal injuries resulting in death of realtor, 49 ALR3d 934.

Liability of vendor's broker or agent to purchaser or prospect for misrepresenting or concealing offer or acceptance, 55 ALR2d 342.

Liability of real estate broker or agent representing both parties to purchaser or prospect for misrepresenting or concealing offer or acceptance, 55 ALR2d 342.

Real estate broker's power to bind principal by representations as to character, condition, location, quantity, or title of property, 58 ALR2d 10.

Financial inability of purchaser to comply with valid contract as affecting broker's right to commission, 74 ALR2d 437.

Broker's right to commission on sale rejected by principal because of buyer's fraud or misrepresentation, 79 ALR2d 1055.

Liability of real estate broker to principal for negligence in carrying out agency, 94 ALR2d 468.

Licensed real estate broker's right to compensation as affected by lack of license on the part of partners, coadventurers, employees, or other associates, 8 ALR3d 523.

Liability of defaulting purchaser to owner's broker, 30 ALR3d 1395.

Broker's right to commission from principal upon procuring third party taking option, 32 ALR3d 321.

Construction of agreement between real estate agents to share commissions, 71 ALR3d 586.

Procurement of real estate broker's license subsequent to execution of contract for services as entitling broker to compensation for services, 80 ALR3d 318.

Real estate broker's liability for misrepresentation as to income from or productivity of property, 81 ALR3d 717.

Necessity of having real estate broker's license in order to recover commission as affected by fact that business sold includes real property, 82 ALR3d 1139.

Duty and liability of real estate agent or broker to purchaser with respect to procurement or transfer of insurance policy, 88 ALR3d 1077.

Validity and application of regulation prohibiting licensed real-estate broker from negotiating sale or lease with owner known to have exclusive listing agreement with another broker, 17 ALR4th 763.

Real-estate broker's rights and liabilities as affected by failure to disclose agreement to loan purchase money to purchaser, 17 ALR4th 788.

Right of attorney, as such, to act or become licensed as real estate broker, 23 ALR4th 230.

Right to private action under state statutes or regulations governing real-estate brokers or salesmen, 28 ALR4th 199.

Real-estate broker's right to recover commission from seller where sale fails because of seller's failure to deliver good title — modern cases, 28 ALR4th 1007.

Remedies for fraud or misrepresentation as to heating or cooling cost of realty purchased, 32 ALR4th 828.

Real estate broker's or agent's misrepresentation to, or failure to inform, vendor regarding value of vendor's property, 33 ALR4th 944.

Real estate broker's rights and liabilities as affected by failure to disclose financial information concerning purchaser, 34 ALR4th 191.

Real-estate brokers: statute or regulation forbidding use of prizes, gifts or premiums as inducement to secure customers, 62 ALR4th 1044.

Broker's liability for fraud or misrepresentation concerning development or nondevelopment of nearby property, 71 ALR4th 511.

What constitutes financial ability to perform within rule entitling broker to commission for producing ready, willing and able purchaser of real property, 87 ALR4th 11.

Liability of vendor or real-estate broker for failure to disclose information concerning off-site conditions affecting value of property, 41 ALR5th 157.

Construction and application of Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 (12 USC §§ 2601 et seq.), 142 ALR Fed 511.

12 C.J.S. Brokers § 1 et seq.